lt-LT: Mineralų klasė: Boratai; Karbonatai; Ciklosilikatai; Halogenidai; Hidroksidai; Inosilikatai; Grynuoliai; Nesosilikatai; Oksidai; Fosfatai; Filosilikatai; Silikatai; Sorosilikatai; Sulfatai; Sulfidai; Tektosilikatas; Kita
pl: Klasa minerału: Borany; Węglany; Cyklokrzemiany; Halogenki; Wodorotlenki; Inokrzemiany; Elementy natywne; Nezokrzemiany; Tlenki; Fosforany; Krzemiany; Krzemiany; Sorokrzemiany; Siarczany; Siarczki; Tektokrzemian; Inne
sv: Mineralklass: Borater; Karbonater; Cyklosilikater; Halider; Hydroxider; Inosilikater; Naturliga element; Nesosilikater; Oxider; Fosfater; Fyllosilikater; Silikater; Sorosilikater; Sulfater; Sulfider; Teksilikat; Övrigt
th: คลาสแร่ธาตุ: บอเรต; คาร์บอเนต; ไซโคลซิลิเกต; เฮไลด์; ไฮดรอกไซด์; ไอโนซิลิเกต; ธาตุธรรมชาติ; นีโซซิลิเกต; ออกไซด์; ฟอสเฟต; ฟิลโลซิลิเกต; ซิลิเกต; โซโรซิลิเกต; ซัลเฟต; ซัลไฟด์; เทกโทซิลิเกต; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Clasa de minerale: Borați; Carbonați; Ciclosilicați; Halogenuri; Hidroxizi; Inosilicați; Elemente native; Nezosilicați; Oxizi; Fosfați; Filosilicații; Silicați; Sorosilicați; Sulfați; Sulfuri; Tectosilicat; Altele
en: Mineral class: Borates; Carbonates; Cyclosilicates; Halides; Hydroxides; Inosilicates; Native elements; Nesosilicates; Oxides; Phosphates; Phyllosilicates; Silicates; Sorosilicates; Sulfates; Sulfides; Tectosilicate; Other
nb: Mineralklasse: Borates; Karbonater; Syklosilikater; Halogenider; Hydroksyder; Inosilikater; Naturlige grunnstoffer; Nesosilikater; Oksider; Fosfater; Fyllosilikater; Silikater; Sorosilikater; Sulfater; Sulfider; Teksilikat; Annet
fi: Mineraaliluokka: Boraatit; Karbonaatit; Syklosilikaatit; Halidit; Hydroksidit; Inosilikaatit; Alkuperäiset elementit; Nesosilikaatit; Oksidit; Fosfaatit; Fyllosilikaatit; Silikaatit; Sorosilikaatit; Sulfaatit; Sulfidit; Tektosilikaatti; Muu
es: Clase de minerales: Boratos; Carbonatos; Ciclosilicatos; Haluros; Hidróxidos; Inosilicatos; Elementos nativos; Nesosilicatos; Óxidos; Fosfatos; Filosilicatos; Silicatos; Sorosilicatos; Sulfatos; Sulfuros; Tectosilicato; Otros
hr-HR: Klasa minerala: Borati; Karbonati; Ciklosilikati; Halidi; Hidroksidi; Inosilikati; Samorodni elementi; Nezosilikati; Oksidi; Fosfati; Filosilikati; Silikati; Sorosilikati; Sulfati; Sulfidi; Tektosilikat; Ostalo
ko: 광물 분류: 붕산염; 탄산염; 사이클로규산염; 할로겐화물; 수산화물; 이노규산염; 자연 요소; 네소규산염; 산화물; 인산염; 필로규산염; 규산염; 소로규산염; 황산염; 황화물; 텍토규산염; 기타
it: Classe minerale: Borati; Carbonati; Ciclosilicati; Alogenuri; Idrossidi; Inosilicati; Elementi nativi; Nesosilicati; Ossidi; Fosfati; Fillosilicati; Silicati; Sorosilicati; Solfati; Solfuri; Tettosilicati; Altro
el: Κατηγορία ορυκτού: Βορικά άλατα; Ανθρακικά άλατα; Κυκλοπυριτικά άλατα; Αλογονίδια; Υδροξείδια; Ινοπυριτικά άλατα; Εγγενή στοιχεία; Νεσοπυριτικά άλατα; Οξείδια; Φωσφορικά άλατα; Φυλοπυριτικά άλατα; Πυριτικά άλατα; Σοροπυριτικά άλατα; Θειικά άλατα; Σουλφίδια; Τεκτοπυριτικά άλατα; Άλλο
tr: Mineral Sınıfı: Boratlar; Karbonatlar; Siklosilikatlar; Halojenürler; Hidroksitler; İnosilikatlar; Yerel öğeler; Nesosilikatlar; Oksitler; Fosfatlar; Fillosilikatlar; Silikatlar; Sorosilikatlar; Sülfatlar; Sülfürler; Tektosilikat; Diğer
cs: Třída nerostů: Boráty; Uhličitany; Cyklokřemičitany; Halogenidy; Hydroxidy; Inosilikáty; Nativní prvky; Nesosilikáty; Oxidy; Fosfáty; Fylosilikáty; Silikáty; Sorosilikáty; Sulfáty; Sulfidy; Tektosilikát; Jiné
zh-CN: 矿物类: 硼酸盐; 碳酸盐; 环硅酸盐; 卤化物; 氢氧化物; 链硅酸盐; 自然元素; 新硅酸盐; 氧化物; 磷酸盐; 页硅酸盐; 硅酸盐; 双硅酸盐; 硫酸盐; 硫化物; 网状硅酸盐; 其他
pt-BR: Classe mineral: Boratos; Carbonatos; Ciclossilicatos; Halogenetos; Hidróxidos; Inossilicatos; Elementos naturais; Nesossilicatos; Óxidos; Fosfatos; Filossilicatos; Silicatos; Sorossilicatos; Sulfatos; Sulfetos; Tectosilicato; Outro
hu: Ásványosztály: Borátok; Karbonátok; Cikloszilikátok; Halogenidek; Hidroxidok; Inoszilikátok; Natív elemek; Nezoszilikátok; Oxidok; Foszfátok; Filoszilikátok; Szilikátok; Soroszilikátok; Szulfátok; Szulfidok; Tektoszilikát; Egyéb
de: Mineralklasse: Borate; Karbonate; Cyklosilicate; Halogenide; Hydroxide; Inosilicate; Gediegene Elemente; Nesosilicate; Oxide; Phosphate; Phyllosilicate; Silicate; Sorosilicate; Sulfate; Sulfide; Tektosilicat; Sonstiges
ru: Класс минерала: Бораты; Карбонаты; Циклосиликаты; Галогениды; Гидроксиды; Иносиликаты; Самородные элементы; Несосиликаты; Оксиды; Фосфаты; Филлосиликаты; Силикаты; Соросиликаты; Сульфаты; Сульфиды; Тектосиликат; Другое
pt-PT: Classificação mineral: Boratos; Carbonatos; Ciclossilicatos; Halogenetos; Hidróxidos; Inossilicatos; Elementos nativos; Nesossilicatos; Óxidos; Fosfatos; Filossilicatos; Silicatos; Sorossilicatos; Sulfatos; Sulfuretos; Tectossilicatos; Outro
fr: Classe minérale: Borates; Carbonates; Cyclosilicates; Halogénures; Hydroxydes; Inosilicates; Éléments naturels; Nésosilicates; Oxydes; Phosphates; Phyllosilicates; Silicates; Sorosilicates; Sulfates; Sulfures; Tectosilicate; Autre
da: Mineralklasse: Borater; Karbonater; Cyclosilikater; Halogenider; Hydroxider; Inosilicater; Naturelementer; Nesosilicater; Oxider; Fosfater; Fylosilikater; Silikater; Sorosilikater; Sulfater; Sulfider; Tectosilikat; Andet
sl-SI: Razred mineralov: Borati; Karbonati; Ciklosilikati; Halidi; Hidroksidi; Inosilikati; Domači elementi; Nesosilikati; Oksidi; Fosfati; Filosilikati; Silikati; Sorosilikati; Sulfati; Sulfidi; Tektosilikat; Drugo
bg-BG: Клас минерали: Борати; Карбонати; Циклосиликати; Халогениди; Хидроксиди; Иносиликати; Местни елементи; Незосиликати; Оксиди; Фосфати; Филосиликати; Силикати; Соросиликати; Сулфати; Сулфиди; Тектосиликат; Други
ja: 鉱物の分類: ホウ酸塩; 炭酸塩; シクロケイ酸塩; ハロゲン化物; 水酸化物; イノケイ酸塩; 元素鉱物; ネソケイ酸塩; 酸化物; リン酸塩; フィロケイ酸塩; ケイ酸塩; ソロケイ酸塩; 硫酸塩; 硫化物; テクトケイ酸塩; その他
sk-SK: Minerálna trieda: Boritany; Uhličitany; Cyklosilikáty; Halogenidy; Hydroxidy; Inosilikáty; Natívne prvky; Nesosilikáty; Oxidy; Fosfáty; Fylosilikáty; Silikáty; Sorosilikáty; Sulfáty; Sulfidy; Tektosilikát; Iné
vi: Phân loại khoáng sản: Borate; Carbonate; Cyclosilicate; Halide; Hydroxide; Inosilicate; Nguyên tố bản địa; Nesosilicate; Oxide; Phosphate; Phyllosilicate; Silicate; Sorosilicate; Sulfate; Sulfide; Tectosilicate; Khác
nl: Mineraalklasse: Boraten; Carbonaten; Cyclosilicaten; Halogeniden; Hydroxiden; Inosilicaten; Natuurelementen; Nesosilicaten; Oxiden; Fosfaten; Fyllosilicaten; Silicaten; Sorosilicaten; Sulfaten; Sulfiden; Tectosilicaat; Andere
zh-TW: 礦物類別: 硼酸鹽; 碳酸鹽; 環矽酸鹽; 鹵化物; 氫氧化物; 鏈矽酸鹽; 原生元素; 新矽酸鹽; 氧化物; 磷酸鹽; 頁矽酸鹽; 矽酸鹽; 島狀矽酸鹽; 硫酸鹽; 硫化物; 網狀矽酸鹽; 其他